Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 5

Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Law

34-5-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Law.”

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-901.

Cross-References. Veterans' Guardianship Act unaffected by Uniform Fiduciaries Act, §35-2-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, §§ 7, 10.

34-5-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrator” means the administrator of veterans affairs of the United States, or the administrator's successor;

“Benefits” means all moneys paid or payable by the United States through the veterans administration;

“Estate” means income on hand and assets acquired partially or wholly with “income”;

“Guardian” means any fiduciary for the person or estate of a ward;

“Income” means moneys received from the veterans administration and revenue or profit from any property wholly or partially acquired with those moneys;

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a corporation or an association;

“Veterans administration” means the veterans administration, its predecessors or successors; and

“Ward” means a beneficiary of the veterans administration.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.2 (Williams, § 8541); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-902.

34-5-103. Administrator as party in interest.

The administrator shall be a party in interest in any proceeding for the appointment or removal of a guardian or for the removal of the disability of minority or mental incapacity of a ward, and in any suit or other proceeding affecting in any manner the administration by the guardian of the estate of any present or former ward whose estate included assets derived in whole or in part from benefits heretofore or hereafter paid by the veterans administration. Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to a hearing in such a matter, notice in writing of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by mail, unless waived in writing, to the office of the veterans administration having jurisdiction over the area in which the suit or proceeding is pending.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.3 (Williams, § 8541.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-903.

34-5-104. Appointment of guardian when necessary prior to payment of benefits.

Whenever, pursuant to any law of the United States or regulation of the veterans administration, it is necessary, prior to payment of benefits, that a guardian be appointed, the appointment may be made in the manner provided in §§34-5-106 —34-5-110.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.4 (Williams, § 8542); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-904.

34-5-105. Limitation on number of wards.

No person, other than a bank or trust company, shall be guardian of more than twelve (12) wards at one time, unless all wards are members of one family.

Upon presentation of a petition by an attorney of the department of veterans services or other interested person, alleging that a guardian is acting in a fiduciary capacity for more than twelve (12) wards as provided in subsection (a) and requesting the guardian's discharge for that reason, the court, upon proof substantiating the petition, shall require a final accounting forthwith from the guardian and shall discharge the guardian from guardianships in excess of twelve (12), after first having appointed a successor.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.5 (Williams, § 8543); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-905; Acts 1990, ch. 623, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “department of veterans services” for “department of veterans' affairs” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 9. July 1, 2015.

34-5-106. Petition for appointment of guardian.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed by any relative or friend of the ward or by any person who is authorized by law to file such a petition. If there is no person so authorized or if the person so authorized refuses or fails to file a petition within thirty (30) days after mailing of notice by the veterans administration to the last known address of the person, if any, indicating the necessity for the appointment, a petition for appointment may be filed by any resident of this state.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age and place of residence of the ward, the name and place of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that the ward is entitled to receive benefits payable by or through the veterans administration, and shall set forth the amount of moneys then due and the amount of probable future payments.

The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward and the name, age, relationship, if any, occupation and address of the proposed guardian and, if the nominee is a natural person, the number of wards for whom the nominee is presently acting as guardian. Notwithstanding any law as to priority of persons entitled to appointment, or the nomination in the petition, the court may appoint some other individual or a bank or trust company as guardian, if the court determines it is for the best interest of the ward.

In the case of a mentally incompetent ward, the petition shall show that the ward has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.6 (Williams, § 8544); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-906.

34-5-107. Evidence of necessity for guardian of minor.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a minor, a certificate of the administrator or the administrator's authorized representative, setting forth the age of the minor as shown by the records of the veterans administration and the fact that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the minor by the veterans administration, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for the appointment.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.7 (Williams, § 8545); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-907.

34-5-108. Evidence of necessity for guardian for incompetent.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a mentally incompetent ward, a certificate of the administrator, or the administrator's duly authorized representative, that the person has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration and that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the ward by the veterans administration, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for the appointment.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.8 (Williams, § 8546); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-908.

34-5-109. Notice of petition for appointment.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian under this chapter, notice shall be given to the ward and to other persons, in the manner provided by the general law of this state, and also to the veterans administration as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.9 (Williams, § 8547); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-909.

34-5-110. Bond of guardian.

Upon the appointment of a guardian, the guardian shall execute and file a bond to be approved by the court in an amount not less than the estimated value of the personal estate and anticipated income of the ward during the ensuing year. The bond shall be in the form and be conditioned as required of guardians appointed under the general guardianship laws of this state. The court may from time to time require the guardian to file an additional bond.

Where a bond is tendered by a guardian with personal sureties, there shall be at least two (2) such sureties and they shall file with the court a certificate under oath which shall describe the property owned, both real and personal, and shall state that each is worth the sum named in the bond as the penalty thereof over and above all debts and liabilities and the aggregate of other bonds on which the guardian is principal or surety and exclusive of property exempt from execution. The court may require additional security or may require a corporate surety bond, the premium thereon to be paid from the ward's estate.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.10 (Williams, § 8548); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-910.

Cross-References. Guardian's bond, §34-1-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 10.

34-5-111. Accounts — Certificate of examination of securities or investments — Copies sent to veterans administration office — Notice of hearing — Property derived from other sources.

Every guardian who has received or shall receive on account of a ward any moneys or other thing of value from the veterans administration shall file with the court annually, on the anniversary date of the appointment, in addition to such other accounts as may be required by the court, a full, true and accurate account under oath of all moneys or other things of value so received by that guardian, all earnings, interest or profits derived from and all property acquired with those moneys or other things of value and of all disbursements from them, and showing the balance of those moneys or other things of value in that guardian's hands at the date of the account and how invested.

The guardian, at the time of filing any account, shall exhibit all securities or investments held by the guardian to an officer of the bank or other depository in which the securities or investments are held for safekeeping or to an authorized representative of the corporation that is surety on the guardian's bond, or to the judge or clerk of a court of record in this state, or, upon request of the guardian or other interested party, to any other reputable person designated by the court, who shall certify in writing that that person has examined the securities or investments and identified them with those described in the account, and shall note any omissions or discrepancies. If the depository is the guardian, the certifying officer shall not be the officer verifying the account. The guardian may exhibit the securities or investments to the judge of the court, who shall endorse on the account and copy of the account a certificate that the securities or investments shown in the account as held by the guardian were each in fact exhibited to the judge and that those exhibited to the judge were the same as those shown in the account, and noting any omission or discrepancy. With respect to funds for which the guardian is accountable, deposited in any bank, federal savings bank or credit union, a guardian's account to the court for those funds may be made in accordance with § 34-1-111(c)(1)(B).

At the time of filing in the court any account, a certified copy of the account and a signed duplicate of each certificate filed with the court shall be sent by the guardian to the office of the veterans administration having jurisdiction over the area in which the court is located. A signed duplicate or a certified copy of any petition, motion or other pleading, pertaining to an account, or to any matter other than an account, and filed in the guardianship proceedings, or in any proceeding for the purpose of removing the disability of minority or mental incapacity, shall be furnished by the person filing the same to the proper office of the veterans administration. Unless a hearing is waived in writing by the attorney of the veterans administration, and by all other persons, if any, entitled to notice, the court shall fix a time and place for the hearing on the account, petition, motion or other pleading not less than fifteen (15) days nor more than thirty (30) days from the date the account, petition, motion or other pleading is filed, unless a different available date is stipulated in writing. Unless waived in writing, written notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given the veterans administration office concerned and the guardian and any others entitled to notice not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. The notice may be given by mail, in which event it shall be deposited in the mails not less than fifteen (15) days prior to that date. The court, or clerk of the court, shall mail to the veterans administration office a copy of each order entered in any guardianship proceeding in which the administrator is an interested party.

If the guardian or conservator is accountable for property derived from sources other than the veterans administration, the guardian or conservator shall be accountable for such other property as is or may be required under the applicable law of this state pertaining to the property of minors or persons adjudicated incompetent who are not beneficiaries of the veterans administration, and as to that other property shall be entitled to the compensation provided by that law. The account for other property may be combined with the account filed in accordance with this section.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.11 (Williams, § 8549); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-911; Acts 1998, ch. 762, § 2; 2011, ch. 47, § 25.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

34-5-112. Failure to account or furnish copies — Penalty.

If any guardian fails to file with the court any account as required by this chapter, or by an order of the court, when any account is due or within thirty (30) days after citation issues as provided by law, or fails to furnish the veterans administration a true copy of any account, petition or pleading, as required by this chapter, this failure may in the discretion of the court be grounds for the guardian's removal.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.12 (Williams, § 8550); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-912.

34-5-113. Compensation of guardians.

Compensation payable to guardians shall be based upon services rendered and shall not exceed seven percent (7%) of the amount of moneys received during the period covered by the account; provided, that the court may approve compensation of not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year in any case in which seven percent (7%) of the income is less than that amount and does not, in the opinion of the court, adequately compensate the guardian for the services rendered during the year. In the event of extraordinary services by any guardian, the court, upon petition and hearing on the petition, may authorize reasonable additional compensation for those services. A copy of the petition and notice of hearing on the petition shall be given to the proper office of the veterans administration in the manner provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account or other pleading. No commission or compensation shall be allowed on the moneys or other assets received from a prior guardian, nor upon the principal amount received from liquidation of loans, or from other investments.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.13 (Williams, § 8551); Acts 1963, ch. 221, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-913; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 17.

34-5-114. Investment of funds.

Every guardian shall invest the corpus of all funds of the guardian's ward, coming into the guardian's hands, only in the following types of securities in which the guardian shall have no interest, directly or indirectly:

The direct bonds and obligations of the United States, or in mutual fund shares of a registered investment company or common trust funds which are invested only in direct bonds and obligations of the United States, or obligations issued separately or collectively by or for federal land banks, federal intermediate credit banks and banks for cooperatives under the act of Congress known as the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 85 Stat. 583, 12 U.S.C § 2001 and amendments to that act, or Home Owners' Loan Corporation bonds, guaranteed in principal and interest by the United States government, procuring them always at the best possible salable or market price obtainable in the interest of the ward; bonds and/or debentures issued by any Federal Home Loan Bank organized under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act of the United States;

The bonds of the state of Tennessee, procuring the bonds always at the best possible salable or market price obtainable in the interest of the ward;

The bonds of any county in this state having a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) by the last federal census next preceding the date of the investment, that has not defaulted within twenty (20) years preceding the investment for more than thirty (30) days in the payment of any part either of principal or interest of any bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness, procuring the bonds always at the best possible salable or market price obtainable in the interest of the ward; provided, that before investment is made in the county bonds as authorized in this subdivision (3), there has been filed with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the guardianship a certificate by the chief financing officer, or treasurer of the county, certifying to the prerequisites as provided in this subdivision (3) regarding population and status of the bonds;

The bonds or notes of any city or town in this state that has a population as shown by the last federal census next preceding the investment of not less than forty-five thousand (45,000) and has not defaulted within twenty (20) years preceding the investment for more than thirty (30) days in the payment of any part either of principal or interest of any bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness, procuring the bonds or notes always at the best possible salable or market price obtainable in the interest of the ward; provided, that before investment is made in city bonds as authorized in this subdivision (4), there has been filed with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the guardianship a certificate by the chief financing officer or treasurer of the city certifying to the prerequisites as provided in this subdivision (4) regarding population and status of the bonds;

First mortgage or trust deed on real estate situated in the county of the guardianship, the amount lent not to exceed one half (½) of the actual cash value of the real estate mortgaged; provided, that the real estate has been appraised and reported as to its cash market value by three (3) disinterested persons appointed for that purpose by the chancery or probate court of the county in which the land lies, upon application to the court to that end, and approved by the court;

Certificates of deposit, time deposits, savings deposits, and any other accounts, issued and accepted by any state or national bank that has insured its accounts with the federal deposit insurance corporation, up to the maximum amount insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation; and

Any type of savings account or deposits (including certificates of deposit) in an amount that is insured with an insurer approved by the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.14 (Williams, § 8552); modified; Acts 1969, ch. 23, § 1; 1969, ch. 150, § 1; 1976, ch. 585, § 1; 1978, ch. 708, § 6.02; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-914; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 18; 2014, ch. 829, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see volume 13 and its supplement.

34-5-115. Time allowed to make investment.

Pending time the investments are being made by the guardian, the guardian shall not be chargeable with interest; provided, that the guardian shall not be allowed more than four (4) months in which to make the investment. If the guardian does not make specified investments in or on the securities named in §34-5-114, the guardian shall be charged with the rate of interest, not exceeding six percent (6%) as the court in which the guardianship is pending may determine to be the fair value of the use of money at that time.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.15 Williams (§ 8552.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-915.

34-5-116. Maintenance and support.

A guardian shall not apply any portion of the income or the estate for the support or maintenance of any person other than the ward, the spouse and the minor children of the ward, except upon petition to and prior order of the court after a hearing. A signed duplicate or certified copy of the petition shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration and notice of hearing on the petition shall be given the office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian's account or other pleading.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.16 (Williams, § 8553); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-916.

34-5-117. Copies of public records to be furnished.

When a copy of any public record is required by the veterans administration to be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in benefits made available by the veterans administration, the official custodian of that public record shall, without charge, provide the applicant for those benefits, or any person acting on the applicant's behalf, or the authorized representative of the veterans administration with a certified copy of the record.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.17 (Williams, § 8554); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-917.

34-5-118. Commitment to veterans administration or other federal agency.

Whenever, in any proceeding under the laws of this state for the commitment of a person alleged to be incompetent or otherwise in need of placement in a hospital or other institution for proper care, it is determined, after the adjudication of the status of that person as may be required by law, that commitment to a hospital for mental illness or other institution is necessary for care or treatment, and it appears that the person is eligible for care or treatment by the veterans administration or other agency of the United States government, the court, upon receipt of a certificate from the veterans administration or other agency showing that facilities are available and that the person is eligible for care or treatment in those facilities, may commit the person to the veterans administration or other agency. The person whose commitment is sought shall be personally served with notice of the pending commitment proceeding in the manner as provided by the law of this state, and nothing in this chapter shall affect the person's right to appear and be heard in the proceedings. Upon commitment, the person, when admitted to any facility operated by an agency within or without this state, shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the veterans administration or other agency. The chief officer of any facility of the veterans administration or institution operated by any other agency of the United States to which the person is so committed shall, with respect to the person, be vested with the same powers as superintendents of state hospitals for mental illness within this state with respect to retention of custody, transfer, or discharge. Jurisdiction is retained in the committing or other appropriate court of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of the person so committed, and to determine the necessity for continuance of commitment, and all commitments pursuant to this chapter are so conditioned.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia, committing a person to the veterans administration, or other agency of the United States government for care or treatment, shall have the same force and effect as to the committed person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the judgment or making the order; and the court of the committing state, or of the District of Columbia, shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person so committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of that person, and of determining the necessity for continuance of restraint, as is provided in subsection (a) with respect to persons committed by the courts of this state. Consent is given to the application of the law of the committing state or district in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any facility of the veterans administration, or of any institution operated in this state by any other agency of the United States to retain custody, or to transfer, parole or discharge the committed person.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the veterans administration or another agency of the United States that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person previously committed to any hospital for the insane, or other institution for the care or treatment of persons similarly afflicted and that the person is eligible for care or treatment, the superintendent of the institution may cause the transfer of the person to the veterans administration or other agency of the United States for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the committing court or proper officer of the court shall be notified of the transfer by the transferring agency. No person who is confined pursuant to conviction of any felony or misdemeanor or who has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of insanity shall be transferred to the veterans administration or other agency of the United States, unless prior to transfer the court or other authority originally committing the person shall enter an order for the transfer after appropriate motion and hearing.

Any person transferred as provided in this section shall be deemed to be committed to the veterans administration or other agency of the United States pursuant to the original commitment.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.18 (Williams, § 8556.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-918; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Transfers from state hospital to veteran's hospital, §33-3-302.

34-5-119. Discharge of guardian and release of sureties.

In addition to any other provisions of law relating to judicial restoration and discharge of guardian, a certificate by the veterans administration showing that a minor ward has attained majority, or that an incompetent ward has been rated competent by the veterans administration upon examination in accordance with law, shall be prima facie evidence that the ward has attained majority, or has recovered competency. Upon hearing after notice as provided by this chapter and the determination by the court that the ward has attained majority or has recovered competency, an order shall be entered to that effect, and the guardian shall file a final account. Upon hearing after notice to the former ward and to the veterans administration as in case of other accounts, upon approval of the final account, and upon delivery to the ward of the assets due the ward from the guardian, the guardian shall be discharged and the guardian's sureties released.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.19 (Williams, § 8556); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-919.

34-5-120. Uniform construction.

This chapter shall be so construed as to make uniform the laws of those states that enact it.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.20 (Williams, § 8558); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-920.

34-5-121. Application of other laws.

Except where inconsistent with this chapter, the laws of this state relating to guardian and ward and the judicial practice relating to those laws, including the right to trial by jury and the right of appeal, shall be applicable to beneficiaries and their estate.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 22; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.21 (Williams, § 8558.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-921.

34-5-122. Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter relating to surety bonds and the administration of estates of wards shall apply to all “income” and “estate,” as defined in this chapter, whether the guardian has been appointed under this chapter or under any other law of this state, special or general, prior or subsequent to the enactment of this chapter.

Acts 1943, ch. 90, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 8558.22 (Williams, § 8558.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 34-922.